Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-208
Signs and obstructions on streets and public property; traffic and safety regulations; powers.

A primary city shall have power to prevent and remove all encroachments on streets, avenues, alleys, and other city property; prevent and punish horseracing, fast driving or riding in the streets, highways, alleys, bridges or places in the city, and all games, practices or amusements therein likely to result in damage to any person or property; to regulate the riding, driving or passing along any street of the city, and to regulate, prevent and punish the riding, driving or passing of horses, mules, oxen, cattle or teams, or any vehicle drawn thereby over, upon or across sidewalks; to regulate and prevent the use of streets, sidewalks, and public grounds for signs, signposts, awnings, telegraph, telephone or other poles, racks, bulletin boards, and the posting of handbills and advertisements; to regulate traffic and sales upon the streets; to prohibit and punish cruelty to animals; to regulate and prevent the moving of buildings through or upon the streets.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, IX, p. 129;

R.S.1913, § 4421;

C.S.1922, § 3805;

C.S.1929, § 15-208;

R.S.1943, § 15-208.

The fact that the Legislature enacts a law making driving a motor vehicle while intoxicated a crime, does not abrogate city ordinance defining and prescribing a penalty for same offense, or deprive municipality of power to legislate on same subject in future. State v. Hauser, 137 Neb. 138, 288 N.W. 518 (1939).

City of Lincoln does not have power under home rule charter to require by ordinance a sign painter to pay ten dollars annual license fee in addition to inspectors' regulatory permit and fee of one dollar for each sign. State v. Wiggenjost, 130 Neb. 450, 265 N.W. 422 (1936).